California statutes. Labor Code
(b) A failure by a farm labor contractor to provide a copy of his or her license to the grower shall not constitute a defense against liability under this section for a grower who subsequently fails to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). A failure by a person acting as a farm labor contractor who is contracted by a farm labor contractor to provide a copy of his or her license to the farm labor contractor shall not constitute a defense against liability under this section for a farm labor contractor who subsequently fails to comply with the requirements of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(c) (1) Any person who acts in the capacity of a farm labor contractor without first securing a license or while his or her license has been suspended or revoked is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both, and is subject to other sanctions under this chapter, including subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1697.

(2) Any grower or farm labor contractor who enters into a contract or agreement in violation of this section shall be subject to a civil action by an aggrieved worker for any claims arising from the contract or agreement that are a direct result of any violation of any state law regulating wages, housing, pesticides, or transportation committed by the unlicensed farm labor contractor. The court shall grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(3) On or after January 1, 2003, any grower, farm labor contractor, or other person acting either individually or as an officer, agent, or employee of any grower or farm labor contractor who knowingly and willfully fails to pay, or causes the failure to pay, wages as set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 1199, or any higher wages that have been agreed to, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as set forth in subdivision (f). However, if the prosecutor elects to prosecute any grower, farm labor contractor, or other person pursuant to this paragraph and subdivision (f), multiple failures to pay wages within a single payroll and in a single pay period shall constitute one violation.

(4) Any aggrieved worker who, claims a violation of this section, may bring a civil action for injunctive relief and lost wages as provided in Section 218, and, upon prevailing, shall recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.

(d) As used in this section:

(1) “Business day” means any day on which the offices of the license verification unit are open to the public for the conducting of business.

(2) “Grower” means any person who owns or leases land used for the planting, cultivation, production, harvesting, or packing of any farm products, if he or she hires or uses persons acting as farm labor contractors, and includes a packing shed or a person or entity who farms the land on behalf of the land owner, whether or not he or she owns or leases the land.

(3) “Inspect,” with regard to inspecting a license, means to examine the license to determine whether it reasonably appears on its face to be genuine.

(4) “License verification unit” means the Farm Labor Contractor License Verification Unit established pursuant to subdivision (e).

(5) “Verify,” with respect to verifying a license, means to contact by telephone, facsimile, website, electronic mail, or other means as determined by the Labor Commissioner, the license verification unit to confirm the validity of a license and to record in the requester’s files the unique verification number provided by the license verification unit to document that the requester confirmed the validity of the license of the farm labor contractor with whom he or she has entered into a contract or agreement to supply services.

(e) The Labor Commissioner shall establish and maintain a Farm Labor Contractor License Verification Unit commencing no later than July 1, 2002. The license verification unit shall, upon the request of a grower or farm labor contractor, certify the status of a state license issued to a farm labor contractor. The license verification unit shall assign a unique verification number to the request and the unit shall within 24 hours send by mail, or, if available, by facsimile or electronic mail, confirmation that will serve as conclusive evidence of compliance with the verification requirements of this section. The obligation under this section to verify licenses shall not become operative and the penalties for failure to verify a license shall not be applicable until three months after the license verification unit becomes operational, as certified by the State Auditor.

(f) (1) On or after January 1, 2003, a violation of paragraph (3) of subdivision (c) is a misdemeanor and is punishable as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 1697, except that the fine portion of the penalty shall be as follows:

(A) Upon conviction for a first violation, by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), and is subject to other sanctions under this chapter, including subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1697. Upon conviction, the Labor Commissioner shall revoke the defendant’s license and the defendant shall be ineligible for a license for a period of one year from the date of revocation.

(B) Upon a conviction for a violation committed within three years after a conviction for a prior violation, by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and is subject to other sanctions under this chapter, including subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1697. Upon a second conviction, the Labor Commissioner shall revoke the defendant’s license and the defendant shall be ineligible for a license for a period of two years from the date of revocation.

(C) Upon a conviction for a violation committed within five years after a second conviction pursuant to subparagraph (B), by a fine of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), and is subject to other sanctions under this chapter, including subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 1697. Upon a third conviction, the Labor Commissioner shall revoke the defendant’s license and the defendant shall not thereafter be eligible to obtain a license.

(2) If a person is prosecuted under this subdivision, that person may not be prosecuted under any other law if the prosecution would be based upon the same set of facts as the prosecution under this subdivision.

(g) A farm labor contractor, a person contracted by a farm labor contractor who is acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor, or an employer of a farm labor contractor is subject to Section 98.6 and 1102.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 157, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.8.

(a) No person whose license was suspended, revoked, or denied renewal by the Labor Commissioner shall perform any activity or service specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1682 or in Section 1682.3 to, for, or under the direction of a farm labor contractor, whether as an employee, independent contractor, or otherwise, for three years after the license is suspended, revoked, or denied renewal, or until the license is reinstated, whichever first occurs.

(b) No farm labor contractor shall knowingly contract with or use any person specified in subdivision (a), whether as an employee, independent contractor, or otherwise, to perform an activity or service specified in subdivision (b) of Section 1682 or in Section 1682.3 for three years after the license of the person is suspended, revoked, or denied renewal, or until the license is reinstated, whichever first occurs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 157, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1695.9.

Any person contracted by a farm labor contractor who is acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor shall first provide to the farm labor contractor a copy of his or her current valid state license. A farm labor contractor is responsible for ensuring that every person who is performing farm labor contracting activities on behalf of the farm labor contractor has obtained a farm labor contractor license as required by Section 1683 prior to the person’s engagement in any activity described in subdivision (b) of Section 1682. A farm labor contractor who utilizes the services of another farm labor contractor who is not his or her employee shall also comply with the provisions of this chapter. The farm labor contractor is responsible for any violations of this chapter committed by his or her employee, whether or not the employee has registered as required by this chapter. The farm labor contractor shall keep a copy of the license or licenses for a period of three years following the termination of the contract or agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 157, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.

No licensee shall:

(1) Make any misrepresentation or false statement in his application for a license.

(2) Make or cause to be made, to any person, any false, fraudulent, or misleading representation, or publish or circulate or cause to be published or circulated any false, fraudulent, or misleading information concerning the terms or conditions or existence of employment at any place or places, or by any person or persons, or of any individual or individuals.

(3) Send or transport any worker to any place where the labor contractor knows a strike or lockout exists, without notifying the worker that such conditions exist.

(4) Do any act in his capacity as a farm labor contractor, or cause any act to be done, which constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude, or the effect of which causes any act to be done which constitutes a crime involving moral turpitude under any law of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1746.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.2.

All vehicles used by a licensee or his or her employees or agents for the transportation of individuals in his or her operations as a farm labor contractor shall have displayed prominently at the entrance of the vehicle the name of the farm labor contractor and the number of his or her license as issued by the Labor Commissioner pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 8.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.3.

Any farm labor contractor or person employed by a farm labor contractor who operates a bus or truck in the transportation of individuals in connection with the business, activities, or operations of a farm labor contractor shall be licensed as required by Section 12519 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 209.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.4.

(a) All vehicles defined in Section 322 of the Vehicle Code, including those described in Section 1696.3, used by a farm labor contractor for the transportation of individuals in his or her operations as a farm labor contractor, including, but not limited to, vehicles not owned by that contractor, shall be registered with the Labor Commissioner. The registration shall include the name of the owner and driver of the vehicle, and the license number and description of the vehicle. The Labor Commissioner shall require, as a condition of registration, that the farm labor contractor submit evidence showing that the contractor has in effect an insurance policy applicable to the vehicle, as required by Section 1695.

(b) Commencing on April 1, 2000, and quarterly thereafter, the Labor Commissioner shall provide the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol with a list of all vehicles registered pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 556, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.5.

Every licensee shall, at the time of each payment of wages, which shall be not less often than once every week as required by Section 205 of this code, furnish each of the workers employed by him or her either as a detachable part of the check, draft, or voucher paying the employee’s wages, or separately, an itemized statement in writing that complies with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 226 and shows in detail each deduction made from the wages.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 9.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.6.

(a) No licensee shall recruit or solicit and transport an employee for farmwork unless he has first obtained, either orally or in writing, a bona fide order for such employment.

(b) Any farm labor contractor who recruits or solicits a farmworker without a bona fide order and induces him to be transported to a proposed jobsite and does not then provide employment for him shall pay wages to such farmworker at the agreed rate of pay for the job to which he was being transported and for the elapsed time from the point of departure with return to the same place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1979.)
-------------------------------------------

1696.8.

(a) The director shall establish a Farm Labor Contractor Enforcement Unit. The unit shall develop a program to provide technical assistance to a district attorney’s office that establishes a local farm labor contractor enforcement unit. A local farm labor contractor enforcement unit established pursuant to this section shall, whenever possible, coordinate its enforcement efforts with the Rural Crime Prevention Program in its jurisdiction, if any, established pursuant to Section 14171 of the Penal Code. Any funds appropriated to the department for purposes of this section shall be administered and allocated by the director.

(b) A local farm labor contractor enforcement unit that receives technical assistance pursuant to this section shall concentrate enhanced prosecution efforts and resources on the prosecution of farm labor contractors who violate a state law regulating wages. For purposes of this subdivision, “enhanced prosecution efforts and resources” include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) “Vertical” prosecutorial representation, whereby the prosecutor who makes the initial filing or appearance performs all subsequent court appearances on a particular case through its conclusion, including the sentencing phase.

(2) Assignment of highly qualified investigators and prosecutors to farm labor enforcement cases.

(3) Significant reduction of caseloads for investigators and prosecutors assigned to farm labor enforcement cases.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 157, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.

(a) Any person who violates this chapter, or who causes or induces another to violate this chapter, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or both.

(b) Any employee aggrieved by any violation of this chapter, other than acts and conduct also proscribed by Sections 1153, 1154, and 1155, may do all of the following:

(1) Bring a civil action for injunctive relief or damages, or both, against a farm labor contractor or unlicensed farm labor contractor who violates this chapter and, upon prevailing, shall
 recover reasonable attorney’s fees and costs, including expert witness fees.

(2) Enforce the liability on the farm labor contractor’s bond.

(c) Any farm labor contractor who engages in farm labor contracting activities after his or her license has been suspended, revoked, or denied reissuance is guilty of an offense punishable by a fine of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment for not less than six months and not more than one year, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 750, Sec. 10.   (SB 1087)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.1.

(a) No person shall make, or cause to be made, false, fraudulent, or misleading representations that employment in the growing or producing of farm products, or an employee benefit related to that employment, will be jeopardized unless an individual or his or her family members pay a fee or other thing of value for transportation by that person to or from the business or worksite of an employer.

(b) Any person who violates this section, or who causes or induces another to violate this section, is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) and not less than five hundred dollars ($500), or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 30 days, or both.

(c) Any individual claiming to be aggrieved by a violation of this section may bring a civil action for injunctive relief, damages, or both. If the court finds that the defendant has violated this section, it shall award actual damages, plus an amount equal to treble the amount of actual damages, or five hundred dollars ($500) per violation, whichever is greater. The court shall also grant a prevailing plaintiff reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(d) Any other party who, upon information and belief, claims a violation of this section has been committed may bring a civil action for injunctive relief on behalf of the general public and, upon prevailing, shall recover reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 476, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.2.

Actions brought under this chapter shall be set for trial at the earliest possible date, and shall take precedence over all other cases, except older matters of the same character and matters to which special precedence may be given by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1000, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.3.

Upon the final determination of the Labor Commissioner that a grower, a farm labor contractor, or person acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor has failed to pay wages to its employees, the grower, farm labor contractor, or person acting in the capacity of a farm labor contractor shall immediately pay those wages. If payment is not made within 30 days of the final determination, the Labor Commissioner shall forward the matter for consideration of prosecution to the local district attorney’s office.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 157, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

1697.5.

(a) It is a violation of this chapter for a licensee to do any of the following:

(1) Fail to train an agricultural employee at the time of hire, as required by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684.

(2) Fail to provide training in the language understood by the agricultural employee, as required by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684.

(3) Fail to provide an agricultural employee with at least the minimum training, as required by subparagraph (C) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684.

(4) Fail
 to provide an agricultural employee either (A) with a record of
 their training, or (B) a copy of the specified Civil Rights Department sexual harassment pamphlet, as required by subparagraph (E) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684.

(5) Provide an agricultural employee with a false record of completion of their
 training, as required by subparagraph (E) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684, when they have, in fact, received no training.

(6) Fail to keep a record of training for each agricultural employee who has received training, as required by subparagraph (F) of paragraph (8) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684.

(b) If, upon inspection or investigation, the Labor Commissioner determines that a violation of any of the provisions listed in subdivision (a) has occurred, the Labor Commissioner may issue a citation and assess a civil penalty in the amount of one hundred dollars ($100) for each violation. In enforcing this section, the Labor Commissioner
 shall take into consideration whether the violation was inadvertent, and in
 their discretion, may decide not to penalize an employer for a first violation when that violation was due to a clerical error or inadvertent mistake.

(c) The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations or civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner for violations of this section shall be the same as those set forth in Section 1197.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 48, Sec. 65.   (SB 189)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.

All fines collected for violations of this chapter shall be paid into the Farmworker Remedial Account and shall be available, upon appropriation, for purposes of this chapter. Of the moneys collected for licenses issued pursuant to this chapter, one hundred fifty dollars ($150) of each annual license fee shall be deposited in the Farmworker Remedial Account pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 1684, three hundred fifty dollars ($350) of each annual license fee shall be expended by the Labor Commissioner to fund the Farm Labor Contractor Enforcement Unit and the Farm Labor Contractor License Verification Unit, both within the department, and the remaining money shall be paid into the Labor Enforcement and Compliance
 Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 181.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.1.

No licensee shall sell, transfer or give away any interest in or the right to participate in the profits of said licensee’s business without the written consent of the Labor Commissioner. A violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor, and shall be punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), or imprisonment for not more than 60 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 917, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.2.

No licensee shall knowingly issue a contract for employment containing any term or condition which, if complied with, would be in violation of law, or attempt to fill an order for help to be employed in violation of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.3.

No licensee shall accept a fee from any applicant for employment, or send any applicant for employment without having obtained orally or in writing, a bona fide order therefor, and in no case shall such licensee accept, directly or indirectly, a registration fee of any kind.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.4.

No licensee shall send or cause to be sent, any woman or minor under the age of 18 years, as an employee to any house of ill fame, to any house or place of amusement for immoral purpose, to places resorted to for the purposes of prostitution, or to gambling houses, the character of which places the licensee could have ascertained upon reasonable inquiry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 271.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.5.

No licensee shall send any minor to any saloon or place where intoxicating liquors are sold to be consumed on the premises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.6.

No licensee shall knowingly permit any persons of bad character, prostitutes, gamblers, intoxicated persons, or procurers to frequent his premises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.7.

No licensee shall accept any application for employment made by or on behalf of any child, or shall place or assist in placing any such child in any employment whatever in violation of Part 4 (commencing with Section 1171) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.8.

No licensee shall divide fees with an employer, an agent or other employee of an employer or person to whom help is furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1505.)
-------------------------------------------

1698.9.

A farm labor contractor successor to any predecessor farm labor contractor that owed wages or penalties to a former employee of the predecessor, whether the predecessor was a licensee under this chapter or not, is liable for those wages and penalties, if the successor farm labor contractor meets one or more of the following criteria:

(a) Uses substantially the same facilities or workforce to offer substantially the same services as the predecessor farm labor contractor. A farm labor contractor that has operated with a valid license for at least the preceding three years shall have an affirmative defense to liability under this
 subdivision for using substantially the same workforce, if all of the following apply:

(1) The individuals in the workforce were not referred or supplied for employment by the predecessor farm labor contractor to the licensed farm labor contractor asserting this defense.

(2) The licensed farm labor contractor asserting the defense has not had any interest in, or connection with, the operation, ownership, management, or control of the business of the predecessor farm labor contractor within the preceding three years.

 (3) The licensed farm labor contractor asserting the defense has not been determined to have violated any provision of the Labor Code within the preceding three years.

(b) Shares in the ownership, management, control of the workforce, or interrelations of business operations with the predecessor farm labor contractor.

(c) Employs in a managerial capacity any person who directly or indirectly controlled the wages, hours, or working conditions of the employees owed wages or penalties by the predecessor farm labor contractor.

(d) Is an immediate family member of any owner, partner, officer, licensee, or director of the predecessor farm labor contractor or of any person who had a financial
 interest in the predecessor farm labor contractor. As used in this section, “immediate family member” means a spouse, parent, sibling, child, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or grandparent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 715, Sec. 1.   (SB 168)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1699.

The Labor Commissioner may, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11371), Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code, adopt, amend, and repeal such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary for the purpose of enforcing and administering this chapter and as are not inconsistent with this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 125.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Talent Agencies [1700. - 1700.54.]



  ARTICLE 1. Scope and Definitions [1700. - 1700.4.]

1700.

As used in this chapter, “person” means any individual, company, society, firm, partnership, association, corporation, limited liability company, manager, or their agents or employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.1.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Theatrical engagement” means any engagement or employment of a person as an actor, performer, or entertainer in a circus, vaudeville, theatrical, or other entertainment, exhibition, or performance.

(b) “Motion picture engagement” means any engagement or employment of a person as an actor, actress, director, scenario, or continuity writer, camera man, or in any capacity concerned with the making of motion pictures.

(c) “Emergency engagement” means an engagement which has to be performed within 24 hours from the time when the contract for such engagement is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 888.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.2.

(a) As used in this chapter, “fee” means any of the following:

(1) Any money or other valuable consideration paid or promised to be paid for services rendered or to be rendered by any person conducting the business of a talent agency under this chapter.

(2) Any money received by any person in excess of that which has been paid out by him or her for transportation, transfer of baggage, or board and lodging for any applicant for employment.

(3) The difference between the amount of money received by any person who furnished employees, performers, or entertainers for circus, vaudeville, theatrical, or other entertainments, exhibitions, or performances, and the amount paid by him or her to the employee, performer, or entertainer.

(b) As used in this chapter, “registration fee” means any charge made, or attempted to be made, to an artist for any of the following purposes:

(1) Registering or listing an applicant for employment in the entertainment industry.

(2) Letter writing.

(3) Photographs, film strips, video tapes, or other reproductions of the applicant.

(4) Costumes for the applicant.

(5) Any activity of a like nature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.3.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “License” means a license issued by the Labor Commissioner to carry on the business of a talent agency under this chapter.

(b) “Licensee” means a talent agency which holds a valid, unrevoked, and unforfeited license under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.4.

(a) “Talent agency” means a person or corporation who engages in the occupation of procuring, offering, promising, or attempting to procure employment or engagements for an artist or artists, except that the activities of procuring, offering, or promising to procure recording contracts for an artist or artists shall not of itself subject a person or corporation to regulation and licensing under this chapter. Talent agencies may, in addition, counsel or direct artists in the development of their professional careers.

(b) “Artists” means actors and actresses rendering services on the legitimate stage and in the production of motion pictures, radio artists, musical artists, musical organizations, directors of legitimate stage, motion picture and radio productions, musical directors, writers, cinematographers, composers, lyricists, arrangers, models, and other artists and persons rendering professional services in motion picture, theatrical, radio, television and other entertainment enterprises.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Licenses [1700.5. - 1700.22.]

1700.5.

No person shall engage in or carry on the occupation of a talent agency without first procuring a license therefor from the Labor Commissioner. The license shall be posted in a conspicuous place in the office of the licensee. The license number shall be referred to in any advertisement for the purpose of the solicitation of talent for the talent agency.

Licenses issued for talent agencies prior to the effective date of this chapter shall not be invalidated thereby, but renewals of those licenses shall be obtained in the manner prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 480, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.6.

A written application for a license shall be made to the Labor Commissioner in the form prescribed by him or her and shall state:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) The street and number of the building or place where the business of the talent agency is to be conducted.

(c) The business or occupation engaged in by the applicant for at least two years immediately preceding the date of application.

(d) If the applicant is other than a corporation, the names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries, financially interested, either as partners, associates, or profit sharers, in the operation of the talent agency in question, together with the amount of their respective interests.

If the applicant is a corporation, the corporate name, the names, residential addresses, and telephone numbers of all officers of the corporation, the names of all persons exercising managing responsibility in the applicant or licensee’s office, and the names and addresses of all persons having a financial interest of 10 percent or more in the business and the percentage of financial interest owned by those persons.

The application shall be accompanied by two sets of fingerprints of the applicant and affidavits of at least two reputable residents of the city or county in which the business of the talent agency is to be conducted who have known, or been associated with, the applicant for two years, that the applicant is a person of good moral character or, in the case of a corporation, has a reputation for fair dealing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.7.

Upon receipt of an application for a license the Labor Commissioner may cause an investigation to be made as to the character and responsibility of the applicant and of the premises designated in such application as the place in which it is proposed to conduct the business of the talent agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.8.

The commissioner upon proper notice and hearing may refuse to grant a license. The proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and the commissioner shall have all the power granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 888.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.9.

No license shall be granted to conduct the business of a talent agency:

(a) In a place that would endanger the health, safety, or welfare of the artist.

(b) To a person whose license has been revoked within three years from the date of application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.10.

The license when first issued shall run to the next birthday of the applicant, and each license shall then be renewed within the 30 days preceding the licensee’s birthday and shall run from birthday to birthday. In case the applicant is a partnership, such license shall be renewed within the 30 days preceding the birthday of the oldest partner. If the applicant is a corporation, such license shall be renewed within the 30 days preceding the anniversary of the date the corporation was lawfully formed. Renewal shall require the filing of an application for renewal, a renewal bond, and the payment of the annual license fee, but the Labor Commissioner may demand that a new application or new bond be submitted.

If the applicant or licensee desires, in addition, a branch office license, he shall file an application in accordance with the provisions of this section as heretofore set forth.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.11.

All applications for renewal shall state the names and addresses of all persons, except bona fide employees on stated salaries, financially interested either as partners, associates or profit sharers, in the operation of the business of the talent agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.12.

A filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be paid to the Labor Commissioner at the time the application for issuance of a talent agency license is filed.

In addition to the filing fee required for application for issuance of a talent agency license, every talent agency shall pay to the Labor Commissioner annually at the time a license is issued or renewed:

(a) A license fee of two hundred twenty-five dollars ($225).

(b) Fifty dollars ($50) for each branch office maintained by the talent agency in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 323, Sec. 61.   Effective July 1, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.13.

A filing fee of twenty-five dollars ($25) shall be paid to the Labor Commissioner at the time application for consent to the transfer or assignment of a talent agency license is made but no license fee shall be required upon the assignment or transfer of a license.

The location of a talent agency shall not be changed without the written consent of the Labor Commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.14.

Whenever an application for a license or renewal is made, and application processing pursuant to this chapter has not been completed, the Labor Commissioner may, at his or her discretion, issue a temporary or provisional license valid for a period not exceeding 90 days, and subject, where appropriate, to the automatic and summary revocation by the Labor Commissioner. Otherwise, the conditions for issuance or renewal shall meet the requirements of Section 1700.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 557, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.15.

A talent agency shall also deposit with the Labor Commissioner, prior to the issuance or renewal of a license, a surety bond in the penal sum of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 46, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.16.

Such surety bonds shall be payable to the people of the State of California, and shall be conditioned that the person applying for the license will comply with this chapter and will pay all sums due any individual or group of individuals when such person or his representative or agent has received such sums, and will pay all damages occasioned to any person by reason of misstatement, misrepresentation, fraud, deceit, or any unlawful acts or omissions of the licensed talent agency, or its agents or employees, while acting within the scope of their employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1382.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.18.

(a) All moneys collected for filing fees and licenses under this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the Labor Enforcement and Compliance Fund.

(b) All fines collected for violations of this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 182.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.19.

Each license shall contain all of the following:

(a) The name of the licensee.

(b) A designation of the city, street, and number of the premises in which the licensee is authorized to carry on the business of a talent agency.

(c) The number and date of issuance of the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 488, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.20.

No license shall protect any other than the person to whom it is issued nor any places other than those designated in the license. No license shall be transferred or assigned to any person unless written consent is obtained from the Labor Commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 888.)
-------------------------------------------

1700.20a.
